Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Article 9. Dissolution

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d Partnership §§ 1402 to 1407.

Inability of partnership to operate at profit as justification for court-ordered dissolution, 20 ALR4th 122.

68 C.J.S. Partnership §§ 440, 441.

§ 17-14-901.
Nonjudicial dissolution.

A limited partnership is dissolved and its affairs shall be wound up upon the happening of the first to occur of the following:

At the time specified in the certificate of limited partnership;

Upon the happening of events specified in writing in the partnership agreement;

Written consent of all partners;

Repealed by Laws 1999, ch. 145, § 2.

Entry of a decree of judicial dissolution under W.S.

17-14-902

;

A vote to dissolve by all of the limited partners, or a number or percentage of limited partners specified in the partnership agreement, within ninety (90) days after an event of withdrawal of the last remaining general partner; or

The failure of the limited partners to admit or appoint another general partner within ninety (90) days after an event of withdrawal of the last remaining general partner.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1; 1995, ch. 45, § 1; 1999, ch. 145, §§ 1, 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-14-902.
Judicial dissolution.

On application by or for a partner the district court may decree dissolution of a limited partnership whenever it is not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in conformity with the partnership agreement.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

§ 17-14-903.
Winding up.

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, the general partners who have not wrongfully dissolved a limited partnership or, if none, the limited partners, may wind up the limited partnership’s affairs; but the district court may wind up the limited partnership’s affairs upon application of any partner, his legal representative, or assignee.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

Derivative action.—

District court properly dismissed limited partners’ action against deceased general partner’s estate because the complaint failed to state any facts entitling them to relief in a direct action since they sought relief for an injury to the limited partnership, not an injury individual to them; adherence to the derivative action requirement was especially appropriate under the circumstances where the proposed direct suit, if successful, would deprive at least six limited partners of recovery. Fritchel v. White, 2019 WY 117, 452 P.3d 601,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 2019).

§ 17-14-904.
Distribution of assets.

Upon the winding up of a limited partnership, the assets shall be distributed as follows:

To creditors, including partners who are creditors, to the extent permitted by law, in satisfaction of liabilities of the limited partnership other than liabilities for distributions to partners under W.S.

17-14-701

or

17-14-704

;

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners and former partners in satisfaction of liabilities for distributions under W.S.

17-14-701

or

17-14-704

; and

Except as provided in the partnership agreement, to partners first for the return of their contributions and secondly respecting their partnership interests, in the proportions in which the partners share in distributions.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 17-14-905.
Reinstatement following administrative dissolution.

A Wyoming limited partnership administratively dissolved for failure to pay fees as provided in W.S. 17-14-209(c) may apply to the secretary of state for reinstatement within two (2) years after the effective date of dissolution. The application shall recite the name of the domestic limited partnership and the effective date of its administrative dissolution.

A domestic limited partnership applying for reinstatement pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall include payment of fees and taxes then delinquent and a reinstatement certificate fee prescribed by the secretary of state by rule.

If the secretary of state determines that the application contains the information required by subsection (a) of this section, that the information is correct and the application contains the fees and taxes required by subsection (b) of this section, he shall cancel the certificate of dissolution and prepare a certificate of reinstatement that recites his determination and the effective date of reinstatement, file the original of the certificate and return a copy to the domestic limited partnership.

When the reinstatement is effective, it relates back and takes effect as of the effective date of the administrative dissolution pursuant to W.S. 17-14-209(c) and the limited partnership resumes carrying on its business as if the administrative dissolution had never occurred.

The domestic limited partnership shall retain its registered name during the two (2) year reinstatement period.

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 18, § 1; 2010, ch. 60, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b), deleted “a sum equal to double the amount of” following “include payment of.”

Effective dates

Laws 2007, ch. 18, § 1, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2010, ch. 60, § 2, effective July 1, 2010, provides: “(a) Notwithstanding
section 1 of this act, if 2010 Senate File 18 is enacted into law,
the amendment of
W.S. 17-15-112(b) in section 1 of this act shall not be effective.

“(b) This section shall not be effective if 2010 Senate File 18
is not enacted into law.”